Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3875
(UTC 810) Record keeping and identification of trust property.

(UTC 810) (a) A trustee shall keep adequate records of the administration of the trust.

(b) A trustee shall keep trust property separate from the trustee's own property.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a trustee shall cause the trust property to be designated so that the interest of the trust, to the extent feasible, appears in records maintained by a party other than a trustee or beneficiary.

(d) If the trustee maintains records clearly indicating the respective interests, a trustee may invest as a whole the property of two or more separate trusts.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 75.

A trustee's failure to keep required records is reason, among other things, for a court reviewing a judicial accounting to resolve doubts against the trustee. In re Estate of Hedke, 278 Neb. 727, 775 N.W.2d 13 (2009).

To further help prevent conflicts of interests, trustees are required to keep adequate records of the trust administration and to keep trust property separate from the trustee's property. In re Estate of Robb, 21 Neb. App. 429, 839 N.W.2d 368 (2013).